Maryland, session 2026, SB0095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
1–301.
In addition to any administrative penalty otherwise applicable, a person that
willfully violates any provision of this article, with respect to which a greater penalty is not
provided by other applicable State law, is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is
subject to a fine not exceeding $100,000.
SUBTITLE 12. PARAMETRIC INSURANCE.
19–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BASIS RISK” MEANS THE RISK THAT A PARAMETRIC BENEFIT DOES NOT
EQUAL THE POLICYHOLDER’S ACTUAL LOSS.
(C) (1) “FALLBACK MECHANISM” MEANS A DATA SOURCE USED TO TRACK
OR COLLECT INFORMATION RELATED TO NATURAL DISASTERS.
(2) “FALLBACK MECHANISM” INCLUDES:
(I) SATELLITE IMAGERY; AND
(II) RADAR DATA.
(D) “INDEPENDENT DATA SOURCE” MEANS A SPECIFIED GOVERNMENTAL
OR THIRD–PARTY AGENCY, SENSOR NETWORK, OR SCIENTIFIC INSTRUMENT USED
TO CONFIRM TRIGGER EVENTS.
(E) “INSURER” MEANS AN INSURER OF PROPERTY OR CASUALTY
INSURANCE THAT ISSUES OR DELIVERS A POLICY OF PARAMETRIC INSURANCE IN
THE STATE.

SENATE BILL 95 3
(F) “LOW–INCOME HOUSEHOLD” MEANS A HOUSEHOLD WITH AN INCOME
THAT DOES NOT EXCEED 50% OF THE AREA MEDIAN INCOME FOR A HOUSEHOLD OF
THE SAME SIZE.
(G) “MODERATE–INCOME HOUSEHOLD” MEANS A HOUSEHOLD WITH AN
INCOME THAT DOES NOT EXCEED 80% OF THE AREA MEDIAN INCOME FOR A
HOUSEHOLD OF THE SAME SIZE.
(H) “PARAMETRIC INSURANCE” MEANS A POLICY THAT PAYS A
PREDETERMINED BENEFIT WHEN A SPECIFIED, OBJECTIVELY MEASURABLE
TRIGGER EVENT OCCURS, REGARDLESS OF ACTUAL LOSS.
(I) “PILOT PROGRAM” MEANS A PARAMETRIC INSURANCE AND
COMMUNITY–BASED PILOT PROGRAM.
(J) “POLICYHOLDER” MEANS THE OWNER OF A POLICY OF PARAMETRIC
INSURANCE.
(K) “PUBLIC ENTITY” INCLUDES A GOVERNMENT–AFFILIATED
ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES PUBLIC SERVICES.
(L) (1) “TRIGGER EVENT” MEANS A NATURAL DISASTER, INCLUDING:
(I) EARTHQUAKES;
(II) HIGH WINDS;
(III) HURRICANES; AND
(IV) FLOODS.
(2) “TRIGGER EVENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A CYBER–RELATED
EVENT.
19–1202.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY WITH RESPECT TO PARAMETRIC INSURANCE
POLICIES OR CERTIFICATES THAT ARE:
(1) ISSUED TO A RESIDENT OF THE STATE; OR
(2) SOLD, SOLICITED, NEGOTIATED, OR OFFERED IN THE STATE.

SENATE BILL 95
19–1203.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, EACH
INSURER SHALL PROVIDE APPLICANTS AND POLICYHOLDERS WITH A WRITTEN
STATEMENT THAT SUMMARIZES THE COVERAGES AND EXCLUSIONS UNDER THE
PARAMETRIC INSURANCE POLICIES ISSUED BY THE INSURER.
(2) THE STATEMENT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED TO:
(I) AN APPLICANT AT THE TIME OF APPLICATION; AND
(II) EACH POLICYHOLDER ON A YEARLY BASIS.
(B) AN INSURER SHALL PROVIDE A ONE–PAGE FACT SHEET WRITTEN IN
CLEAR, PLAIN LANGUAGE TO AN INDIVIDUAL OR A SMALL BUSINESS POLICYHOLDER
AT THE TIME OF ISSUANCE OR RENEWAL OF A PARAMETRIC INSURANCE POLICY
THAT DESCRIBES THE BASIS RISK UNDER THE POLICY.
(C) THE STATEMENTS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) CONTAIN THE INSURER’S CURRENT ADDRESS, TELEPHONE
NUMBER, AND WEBSITE ADDRESS; AND
(2) BE SENT TO THE APPLICANT OR THE INSURED:
(I) IN ELECTRONIC FORM TO THE LAST KNOWN E–MAIL
ADDRESS OF THE APPLICANT OR INSURED; OR
(II) BY FIRST–CLASS MAIL TO THE LAST KNOWN ADDRESS OF
THE APPLICANT OR THE INSURED.
19–1204.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, EACH INSURER SHALL REPORT TO
THE COMMISSIONER INFORMATION REGARDING PARAMETRIC INSURANCE
POLICIES, INCLUDING INFORMATION ON THE FOLLOWING AS REQUIRED BY THE
COMMISSIONER:
(1) THE NUMBER OF POLICIES ISSUED;
(2) PREMIUMS;

SENATE BILL 95 5
(3) TRIGGER EVENTS;
(4) PROVIDED BENEFITS;
(5) INFORMATION ON ANY DISPUTES; AND
(6) BASIS RISK INCIDENTS.
19–1205.
(A) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE AN INSURER TO
DISCLOSE INFORMATION THAT IS PROPRIETARY OR IS TRADE SECRET INFORMATION
UNDER APPLICABLE LAW.
(B) TO QUALIFY AS A TRIGGER EVENT UNDER A PARAMETRIC INSURANCE
POLICY, THE EVENT MUST BE:
(1) MEASURABLE THROUGH OBJECTIVE CRITERIA; AND
(2) VERIFIABLE BY AN INDEPENDENT SOURCE.
(C) TO MEASURE A TRIGGER EVENT, AN INSURER MAY USE:
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A PROPRIETARY
INDEX; OR
(2) IF PRIMARY DATA IS UNAVAILABLE, A FALLBACK MECHANISM.
(D) AN INSURER MAY USE A PROPRIETARY INDEX UNDER SUBSECTION
(C)(1) OF THIS SECTION ONLY IF THE INSURER PROVIDES ACCESS TO AUDIT
REPORTS.
19–1206.
(A) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE, EACH INSURER
SHALL FILE WITH THE COMMISSIONER ALL RATES, SUPPLEMENTARY RATE
INFORMATION, POLICY FORMS, MODIFICATIONS OF RATES, AND ENDORSEMENTS
THAT THE INSURER PROPOSES TO USE.
(B) IN EACH FILING SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE INSURER SHALL
STATE THE APPLICABLE EFFECTIVE DATES OF THE RATE AND INDICATE THE
CHARACTER AND EXTENT OF THE COVERAGE CONTEMPLATED.

SENATE BILL 95
19–1207.
(A) EACH INSURER THAT ISSUES, SELLS, OR DELIVERS A PARAMETRIC
INSURANCE POLICY SHALL, AT THE TIME OF APPLICATION AND RENEWAL, OFFER IN
WRITING TO PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR LOSS THAT IS CAUSED BY OR RESULTS FROM
A TRIGGER EVENT.
(B) AN OFFER REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
INCLUDE AN EXPLANATION, WRITTEN IN CLEAR AND SPECIFIC TERMS, OF:
(1) THE TRIGGER EVENT;
(2) THE METHODOLOGY USED TO MEASURE THE TRIGGER EVENT;
(3) BASIS RISK, INCLUDING AT LEAST TWO NUMERICAL EXAMPLES;
(4) THE PROPOSED TIMELINE FOR ANY BENEFIT;
(5) ANY INDEPENDENT DATA SOURCE; AND
(6) FALLBACK PROCESSES.
(C) AN INSURER SHALL PROVIDE THE EXPLANATION REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION TO AN APPLICANT IN THE SAME MANNER AS
STATEMENTS UNDER § 19–1203 OF THIS SUBTITLE ARE REQUIRED TO BE PROVIDED.
(D) AN INSURER MAY COMPLY WITH THE RENEWAL NOTICE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS SECTION BY SENDING THE NOTICE IN THE SAME MANNER AS THE
STATEMENTS REQUIRED UNDER § 19–1203 OF THIS SUBTITLE ARE PROVIDED.
19–1208.
(A) AN INSURER THAT ISSUES A POLICY OF PARAMETRIC INSURANCE MAY
NOT ADOPT AN UNDERWRITING STANDARD OF THE POLICY IN THE CASE OF A
TRIGGER EVENT UNLESS THE INSURER HAS FILED THE UNDERWRITING STANDARD
WITH THE COMMISSIONER.
(B) THE FILING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(1) BE MADE AT LEAST 60 DAYS BEFORE THE DATE THAT THE
INSURER PROPOSES TO IMPLEMENT THE UNDERWRITING STANDARD IN THE STATE;
AND

SENATE BILL 95 7
(2) INCLUDE:
(I) A COPY OF THE UNDERWRITING STANDARD THE INSURER
INTENDS TO IMPLEMENT;
(II) THE DATE ON WHICH THE INSURER INTENDS TO IMPLEMENT
THE UNDERWRITING STANDARD;
(III) POLICY AND CONSUMER DISCLOSURE FORMS;
(IV) CONTRACT TERMS;
(V) A MEMORANDUM SUPPORTING RATES AND PRICING
METHODOLOGY;
(VI) A DESCRIPTION OF INDEPENDENT DATA PROTOCOLS;
(VII) AN EXPLANATION OF VERIFICATION PROTOCOLS; AND
(VIII) EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS ON BASIS RISK.
(C) AN UNDERWRITING STANDARD ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
COMPLY WITH ALL APPLICABLE LAWS.
19–1209.
(A) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ESTABLISH A PILOT PROGRAM TO:
(1) PROVIDE INSURERS PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT PROGRAM
ADDITIONAL OPPORTUNITIES TO PROVIDE PARAMETRIC INSURANCE PRODUCTS;
(2) SERVE A PUBLIC NEED;
(3) PROTECT VULNERABLE POPULATIONS; AND
(4) ADVANCE POLICY GOALS IN THE STATE.
(B) EACH INSURER PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT PROGRAM SHALL COMPLY
WITH REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSIONER THAT GOVERN THE PILOT
PROGRAM.
(C) THE COMMISSIONER MAY:

SENATE BILL 95
(1) AUTHORIZE AN INSURER TO OFFER PRODUCTS FOR LOW– OR
MODERATE–INCOME HOUSEHOLDS, SMALL BUSINESSES, LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL
UNITS, OR PUBLIC ENTITIES; AND
(2) ESTABLISH AN EXPEDITED REVIEW PROCESS FOR PUBLIC OR
COMMUNITY–BASED PILOT PROGRAMS.
(D) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL REQUIRE EACH INSURER THAT
PARTICIPATES IN THE PILOT PROGRAM TO REPORT TO THE COMMISSIONER ON THE
RESULTS OF THE PILOT PROGRAM ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR.
19–1210.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE IMPLEMENTATION
OF THIS SUBTITLE WITH RESPECT TO THE OFFERING OF PARAMETRIC INSURANCE
IN THE STATE.
19–1211.
THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
19–1212.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CITED AS THE MARYLAND PARAMETRIC INSURANCE
AUTHORIZATION AND CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Insurance
Administration shall adopt regulations in accordance with § 19–1211 of the Insurance
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, on or before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.